Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 9

Judicial Intervention

48-245-901. Judicial intervention and dissolution.

A court may grant any equitable relief it considers just and reasonable in the circumstances or may dissolve an LLC and/or direct that the dissolved entity be merged into another or new LLC or other entity on the terms and conditions the court deems equitable.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-245-902. Judicial dissolution.

On application by the attorney general and reporter or by or for a member, the court may decree dissolution, winding up and termination of an LLC whenever it is not reasonably practicable to carry on the business in conformity with the articles and/or the operating agreement.

The dissolution is effective upon the decree of dissolution becoming final and nonappealable. Such decree shall be filed with the office of the secretary of state and shall serve as a notice of dissolution.

The termination is effective upon a decree of termination becoming final and nonappealable. Such decree shall be filed with the office of the secretary of state and shall serve and have the same effect as articles of termination.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 2010, ch. 742, § 3.

48-245-903. Procedure for judicial dissolution.

Venue. Venue for a proceeding by the attorney general and reporter to dissolve an LLC lies in Davidson County. Venue for a proceeding brought by any other party lies in the county where the LLC's principal executive office is or was last located.

Parties. It is not necessary to make members parties to a proceeding to dissolve an LLC unless relief is sought against them individually.

Injunctions. A court in a proceeding brought to dissolve an LLC may issue injunctions, appoint a receiver or custodian pendente lite with all powers and duties the court directs, take other action required to preserve the LLC's assets wherever located, and carry on the business of the LLC until a full hearing can be held.

Bond and Expenses. In a proceeding for dissolution by a member, the petitioner shall execute and file in the proceeding a bond, with sufficient surety, to cover the defendant's probable costs, including reasonable attorney fees, in defending the petition. The court shall determine the amount of the bond and may award to any party its reasonable costs, including attorney fees, if it finds for such party in the proceeding.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-245-904. Receivership or custodianship.

A court having equity jurisdiction in a judicial proceeding brought to dissolve an LLC may appoint one (1) or more receivers to wind up and liquidate, or one (1) or more custodians to manage the business and affairs of the LLC. The court shall hold a hearing, after notifying all parties to the proceeding and any interested persons designated by the court, before appointing a receiver or custodian. The court appointing a receiver or custodian has exclusive jurisdiction over the LLC and all of its property wherever located.

The court may appoint an individual or a domestic or foreign business entity (authorized to transact business in this state) as a receiver or custodian. The court may require the receiver or custodian to post bond, with or without sureties, in an amount the court directs.

The court shall describe the powers and duties of the receiver or custodian in its appointing order, which may be amended from time to time. Among other powers:

The receiver may:

Dispose of all or any part of the assets of the LLC wherever located, at a public or private sale, if authorized by the court; and

Sue and defend in the receiver's own name as receiver of the LLC in all courts of this state;

The custodian may exercise all of the powers of the LLC, through or in place of its board of governors or managers, to the extent necessary to manage the affairs of the LLC in the best interests of its shareholders and creditors.

The court during a receivership may redesignate the receiver a custodian, and during a custodianship may redesignate the custodian a receiver, if doing so is in the best interests of the LLC and its members and creditors.

The court from time to time during the receivership or custodianship may order compensation paid and expense disbursements or reimbursements made to the receiver or custodian and the receiver's or custodian's counsel from the assets of the LLC or proceeds from the sale of the assets.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. “Governors or managers” has been substituted for “directors or officers” in (c)(2), the language as originally enacted in Acts 1994, ch. 868.